Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0762.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5a. (1) The Michigan public service On or before the first Monday of March each year, the commission shall make submit an annual report , summarizing that summarizes the activities of the commission , to the governor and the legislature. on or before the first Monday of March of each year. The annual report shall be must include a summary of commission activities and may include rules, opinions, and orders promulgated or entered by the commission during the calendar year covered by the annual report. The annual report shall must also contain any other information which that the commission considers to be of value. (2) Not later than July 1, 2027, and by each July 1 thereafter, the commission shall publish a report on the commission's website that contains the following information: (a) The total amount of water used by each data center in each public water supply's service area for the preceding calendar year. Not later than June 1, 2027, and by each June 1 thereafter, each public water supply shall submit to the commission the total water usage data described in this subdivision. (b) The total amount of energy used by each data center, described in total gigawatts per year, for the preceding calendar year. (3) As used in subsection (2): (a) "Data center" means a facility that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (b) "Public water supply" means that term as defined in section 2 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1002.